cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/no_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Norwegian

// First version by Jonathan Duddington
// October 2010 improvements by Eirini Florou <eirini.florou@gmail.com>


.group a
        a          A:
        a (CC      A
        a (C       a
        a (_       A
//     X) a (CCK   A  // single syllable with >= 2 final consonants
//                    // or initial syllable with 3 consonants
        ai         AI
        au         aU

        aa         o:        // å
        aa (CC     O
        ae         a:        // æ
        ae (CC     a


.group b
        b          b
        bb         b:

     _) be (@      b@


.group c
        c          k
        cc         k:
     _) c (e       s
        c (i       s
        c (y       s
        c (ei      s
        c (øy      s
        ch         S

.group d
        d          d
        dd         d:
     r) d (_ 
     &) det (_     da#

.group e
        e          e:
        e (CC      E
        ei         aI
        e (rC      a         //  ??
     &) e (_       a#
     &) e (C_      @
     X) e (m_      E
     &) en (_      @n
     &) ene (_     Ena#      // @na# ??
     &) ens (_     @ns
     &) es (_      @s
     &) et (_      @t

.group f
        f          f

.group g
        g          g
        gg         g:
        g (n       N
        gj         j
        g (i       j
        g (y       j
        g (ei      j
        g (øy      j

.group h
        h          h
        hj         j
        hv         v

.group i
        i          i:
        i (CC      I
     &) ig (_      I

.group j
        j          j

.group k
        k          k
        kk         k:
        kj         x
        k (i       x
        k (y       x
        k (ei      x
        k (øy      x

.group l
        l          l
        ll (K      l
        lj         j
        ld         ll

.group m
        m          m
        mm (K      m

.group n
        n          n
        nn (K      n
        ng         N
        n (k       N
        nd         nn

.group o
        o          u:
        o (CC      O
        oi         OI

        oe         Oa#
    @b) oe (_      u:

        o (nd      U
        o (rt      U
     b) o (rd      u:
        o (st      U

.group p
        p          p
        pp         p:

.group q
        q          k
        qq         k:
        qu         kw

.group r
        r          R
        rs (_      S

.group s
        s          s
        ss         ss
        ss (_      s
        sch        S
        sj         S
        skj        S
        sk (i      S
        sk (y      S
        sk (ei     S
        sk (øy     S
     r) s          S
        s (l       S
     A) s (lA      s

.group t
        t          t
        tt         t:
        ti (on     S
        tj         s;



.group u
        u          u-:
        u (CC      u-
        ui         u-I

.group v
        v          v
        vv (_      v

.group w
        w          v

.group x
        x          ks
        x (x 
     _) x          s

.group y
        y          y:
        y (CC      y

.group z
        z          s
        zz         z
        zz (_      z

.group å
        å          o:
        åe         o:a#
        å (CC      O

.group æ
        æ          E:
        æ (r       a:
        æ (CC      a

.group ø
        ø          Y:
        ø (CC      W
        øy         Yy

.group ä
        ä          E:
        ä (CC      E

.group ö
        ö          Y:
        ö (CC      W

.group
        é          'e:
        ü          y:

        $          dOllA:R
        !          _:'u-:tRu:pstENn_:
     !) ! 

        .          pu-Nktu-:m
        . (.       _:
    \.) . 

    __) - (_D      mi:nu-:s
    A_) - (_D      _
    C_) - (_D      _
